Washington statutes.
RCW 7.21.070

Appellate review.

A party in a proceeding or action under this chapter may seek appellate review under applicable court rules. Appellate review does not stay the proceedings in any other action, suit, or proceeding, or any judgment, decree, or order in the action, suit, or proceeding to which the contempt relates.

[ 1989 c 373 s 7.]